Utah statutes.
9-4-608.   Misconduct of commissioners -- Removal.
(1)  For inefficiency, neglect of duty, or misconduct in office, a
commissioner of an authority may be removed by the mayor or, in the case of an
authority for a county, by the body that appointed the commissioner.
(2)  A commissioner may be removed only after a hearing and after he has been
given a copy of the charges at least ten days prior to the hearing and had an
opportunity to be heard in person or by counsel.
(3)  If a commissioner is removed, a record of the proceedings, together with
the charges and findings, shall be filed in the office of the clerk.
